Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6910
Number of new employees, defined.

Number of new employees means the number of equivalent employees that are employed at the qualified location during a year that are in excess of the number of base-year employees.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 10.